hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-la-x-liturgic.tex
% copyright: Copyright (C) 2016-2017 Claudio Beccari, Elie Roux
% title: Hyphenation patterns for liturgical Latin
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
% language:
%     name: Liturgical Latin
%     tag: la-x-liturgic
% version: 2017-09-13
% authors:
%     -
%         name: Claudio Beccari
%         contact: claudio.beccari (at) gmail.com
%     -
%         name: Monastery of Solesmes
%     -
%         name: Élie Roux
%         contact: elie.roux (at) telecom-bretagne.eu
% licence:
%   -
%     name: MIT
%     url: https://opensource.org/licenses/MIT
%     text: >
%         Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining
%         a copy of this software and associated documentation files (the
%         "Software"), to deal in the Software without restriction, including
%         without limitation the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish,
%         distribute, sublicense, and/or sell copies of the Software, and to
%         permit persons to whom the Software is furnished to do so, subject to
%         the following conditions:
%
%         The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be
%         included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
%
%         THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND,
%         EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF
%         MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND
%         NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS
%         BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN
%         ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN
%         CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE
%         SOFTWARE.
% hyphenmins:
%     typesetting:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
% texlive:
%     encoding: ec
%     babelname: liturgicallatin
%     message: Liturgical Latin hyphenation patterns
%     description: |-
%         Hyphenation patterns for the Liturgical Latin in T1/EC and UTF-8
%         encodings.
%     package: latin
\patterns{
.a3b3æq
.a2b1ali
.a2b1auu
.a2b3c
.a2b1eo
.á2b1eo
.a2b1er
.a2b1ér
.a4b3es
.a2b1eu
.a2b1eú
.a2b1éu
.a2bfu
.a2b1í
.a2b1ic
.a2b1i2ec
.a2b1i2éc
.a2b3ier
.a2b3iér
.a2b1ig
.á2b3ig
.a2b1i2i
.a2b1i2í
.á2b1i2i
.a2b1in1
.a2b1ir
.a2b1it
.á2b1it
.a2b1i4u
.a2b1i4ú
.a2b1iv
.a2bj
.a2b3l
.á2b3lu
.a2b1ol
.a2b1ól
.a2b1om
.a2b1or
.a2b1ór
.a2b1ort
.a2b3r
.á2b3r
.a3b4rah
.á3b4rah
.a2b3ru
.ab4s3c
.áb4s3c
.ab5s4ce
.ab5s4cé
.ab5s4ci
.ab5s4cí
.ab5s4cis
.ab5s4cin
.ab5s4cín
.ab3s2en
.ab3s2én
.ab3si2
.ab5s4i3d
.áb5s4i3d
.ab5si3l
.ab5si3m
.ab3so
.ab3só
.ab5s4on
.ab5s4ón
.áb5s4on
.ab4s3tem
.ab4s3tém
.ab3s2ten
.ab4s3ter
.ab4s3tér
.ab4s3tin
.ab4s3tín
.áb4s3tin
.ab4s3tr
.áb4s3tr
.ab4s3tu
.ab4s3tú
.ab3su2
.ab5su3m
.a2b3und
.a2b3únd
.a2b3us
.a2b3ut
.a2b3út
.a2d3
.á2d3
.a3d4æ
.a4d5æq
.a3d4am.
.a2d3a3s4cr
.a3d4eps
.ader2
.a2dfu
.adi2a
.ádi2a
.adi2á
.a3d4i3ab
.a3d4i3áb
.adi2e
.adi2é
.adi3eu
.ad3i2i
.ad3i2í
.adi2o
.ádi2o
.a3d4ip
.a3d4íp
.á3d4ip
.a4d5ipisc
.a4d5ipísc
.ad5is.
.ad5it.
.ad3i2u
.ad3i2ú
.ádi2u
.a4d3ole
.a3d4on
.a3d4ón
.a3d4ran
.a3d4rán
.á3d4ran
.ad3s2cr
.ad3si
.a2d5s2t
.á2d5s2tr
.adsu3e
.a3d4u3a
.a3d4u3á
.a4d5ul
.a3d4urn
.a3d4y
.a3d4ý
.á3d4y
.alte3r
.alté3r
.álte3r
.alte4rc
.alté4rc
.alte4rn
.alté4rn
.alte4rp
.alté4rp
.alte4rt
.alte4r3ut
.alté4r3ut
.alte4r3út
.ani2m3ad
.anti1
.anti3m2n
.ape3r2u
.archi3e
.a3s2c
.á3s2c
.a3s2p
.á3s2p
.a4s3pid
.á4s3pid
.a4s3per
.á4s3per
.a5s4perg
.a5s4pern
.a5s2t
.a5s4tern
.a5s4tip
.a5s4tr
.a5s4tu
.a5s4tú
.b2
.beni4a
.béni4a
.be4th5l
.bé4th5l
.c2
.ce4u.
.circu4m1
.circú4m1
.circumi2a
.circumi2á
.circumi2e
.circumi2i
.circumi2í
.circumi2n3i4i
.circumi2o
.circumi2u
.circum5s4
.circú4m5s4
.ci2s3
.co1e
.co3e2lec
.co3e2lig
.co3emen
.co2e1n
.co3e2r
.co3e2x3
.coex3s2
.co3g2nos
.co3g2nós
.co1i
.co1i2e
.coi3u
.co2m3ed
.co2m3éd
.có2m3ed
.co2m3es.
.co2m3it
.co2m3ít
.có2m3it
.co2n1
.có2n1
.co3n2a
.co3n2á
.co3n2e
.co3n2é
.co3n2i
.co3n2í
.coni2a
.con3ic
.coni2e
.co6n5i4ec
.co6n5i4éc
.co6n3i4i
.co6n3i4í
.co4n3i2u
.co4n3i2ú
.có4n3i2u
.co3n2o
.co3n2ó
.con3s2cr
.cón3s2cr
.con3s2p2
.cón3s2p2
.con5s4t
.cón5s4t
.co3n2u
.co3n2ú
.cu4m5s4cr
.cu4sp
.de1í
.dé1i
.de1in
.de1ín
.de1it
.depe4r5
.depé4r5
.de3s2c
.de3s2p
.dé3s2p
.de3s2q
.de5s2tit
.de5s2tít
.de5s2til
.de5s2tíl
.de5s2tru
.de5s2trú
.dé5s2tru
.de4uter
.di3g2nosc
.di3i4u
.di3i4ú
.di3œ
.di2r1im
.di2r1ím
.di4s3
.dí4s3
.di5s4ced
.di5s4céd
.di5s4cen
.di5s4cén
.di5s4cep
.di5s4cép
.di5s4cer
.di5s4cér
.di5s4ces
.di5s4cés
.di5s4cid
.di5s4cíd
.di5s4cin
.di5s4cín
.di5s4cip
.di5s4cíp
.di5s4ciss
.di5s4císs
.di5s4cit
.dí5s4cit
.di5s4cr
.di6s5cre
.di6s5cré
.di6s5crim
.di6s5crím
.di6s5cru
.di6s5cruc
.di6s5crúc
.di5s4ert
.di5s4ért
.di2s1i2
.di2s1í2
.disi3c
.disí3c
.di2sj
.di5s4pe
.di5s4pé
.di6s5pen
.di6s5pén
.di6s5per
.di6s5pér
.dispe4r5e
.dispé4r5e
.dispe4r5i
.dispé4r5i
.di7s6pers
.di7s6pérs
.di7s6perg
.di7s6pérg
.di5s4pi
.di5s4pí
.di5s4ta
.di5s4tá
.di5s4tin
.di5s4tín
.di6s5tine
.di6s5tíne
.di5s4tir
.di5s4tír
.di5s4to.
.di5s4tric
.di5s4tríc
.di5s4trin
.di5s4trín
.di3u
.di3ú
.ele2uth
.elé2uth
.e2t3en
.é2t3en
.e2t3i3am
.é2t3i3am
.e2t3i3ám
.e4u
.e4ú
.é4u
.e5um
.e5úm
.e5un
.e5ún
.e6unu
.e6únu
.e5us.
.e2x3
.é2x3
.e3x4ed
.é3x4ed
.e3x4éd
.e3x4eget
.e3x4egét
.e3x4od
.é3x4od
.e3x4ód
.e3x4orc
.ex5s4c
.éx5s4c
.exs2p
.éxs2p
.ex5s2t
.éx5s2t
.f2
.g2
.h2
.haru3s4p
.harú3s4p
.he3i.
.he3u.
.hi2e
.hi2é
.hucu4s
.hu1i2u
.hu1i2ú
.i4a
.i4á
.iai2u
.i3bi
.i3bí
.i3bo
.i3bó
.i3bu
.i3bú
.i3co
.i3có
.i2d1
.i2dci
.i3d2e
.i3d2é
.í3d2e
.i4d3em
.i5den
.i4d3eo.
.í4d3eo.
.i4d3eoq
.i4d3eóq
.i4d3es
.i3d2ib
.i3di2og
.i3d2ol
.i3d2ól
.i3d2on
.i3d2ón
.i3d2us
.i2e
.i2é
.iei2u
.i3i
.i3í
.í3i
.i4n3
.í4n3
.ina2b3r
.inab3s2
.ina2cr
.ina2df
.i3n2an
.i3n2án
.incircu4m
.in4d3ep
.in4d3ép
.in4d3ig
.ín4d3ig
.in5d4ign
.in5d4ígn
.in4d3ipis
.in4d3ipís
.in5d4is
.in4d3u
.ín4d3u
.in4d3ú
.in5d4uc
.in5d4úc
.in5d4ul
.in5d4úl
.in5d4um
.in5d4úm
.in5d4us
.in5d4ús
.in5d4ux
.in5d4úx
.i3n2ers
.i3n2ert
.ine2x3
.inexs2t
.infra3s4
.ini2e
.ini2é
.ini2í
.i3n2it
.ini2u
.ini2ú
.ino2b3
.ino3b2oe
.ino2b3œ
.inob3s2c
.inpe2r3iur
.in3s4cr
.in3s2p
.in5s2t
.ín5s2t
.inte2r3e
.inte2r3é
.inté2r3e
.inte3r4em
.inte3r4ém
.inte3r4en
.inte3r4én
.inte3r4er
.inté3r4er
.inte3r4ér
.inte3r4es
.inte4r5ess
.inte3r4et
.inte3r4ét
.inte2r3i
.inte2r3í
.inté2r3i
.ínte2r3i
.interi2a
.interi2á
.interi2e
.interí2e
.interi2é
.interi2i
.interi2í
.inte3r4i3or
.inte3r4i3ór
.inté3r4i3or
.interi2u
.interi2ú
.inte3r4ius.
.inté3r4ius.
.inte2r3s4pe
.inte2r3s4pé
.intro3i3e
.intro3i3é
.intro3s4p
.inu2a
.inu2e
.inu2i
.i3n2ul
.i4n3ulc
.inu2o
.inu2u
.i2o
.i2ó
.i4u
.i4ú
.iu2s3i2ur
.j2
.l2
.la4u
.lecti5s4t
.lon2g1an
.lon2g1án
.lu4x3q
.lu3x2u
.lu3x2ú
.m2
.mai4u
.n2
.ne2c1op
.ne2c1óp
.ne2g1ot
.ne2g1ót
.ne2u.
.ne2ut
.né2ut
.o2b1
.ó2b1
.o3b2ed
.o3b2éd
.o3b2el
.o3b2es
.obi2a
.o3b2ic
.o4b3ici
.obi2e
.obi2é
.obi3er
.o3b2ig
.ob3i4i
.ob3i4í
.ob3i2u
.ob3i2ú
.ob3l
.ób3l
.o4b3œ
.ob3r
.ób3r
.ób3ru
.o3b4ruz
.ob3s2c
.ob3s2cu
.ob5s2t
.ób5s2t
.ob3tr
.obu2a
.obu2e
.obu2i
.obu2o
.p2
.pæ2n3ins
.pæ2n3íns
.para1i
.para1u
.pe1i6or
.pe1i6ór
.pe2r1absu
.pe2r1ac
.pe2r1ác
.pe2r1a2dp
.pe2r1a2d1u
.pe2r1ae
.pe2r3ag
.pe2r3ág
.pé2r3ag
.pe2r1ama
.pe2r1amá
.pe2r1amb
.pe2r1ámb
.pe4r3ant
.pe2r1ar
.pe2r1ár
.pe2r1a2u
.pe2r1coq
.pe2r1cu
.pe2r3ea
.pe2r3eám
.pé2r3eam
.pé2r3eant
.pe2r3eát
.pé2r3eat
.pe2r3eas
.pé2r3eas
.pe4r3ec
.pe4r1ed
.pe2r1eff
.pe2r3ég
.pe6r3egr
.pé6r3egr
.pe2r1el
.pe2r1em
.pe2r1ém
.pe4r5end
.pe4r5énd
.pe4r3enn
.pe4r3énn
.pe2r3eo
.pé2r3eo
.pe4r3err
.pe4r3érr
.pe2r1eru
.pe2r3es.
.pe2r3eu
.pe2r3eú
.pé2r3eu
.pe4r1e2x3
.pe2r3h
.pé2r3h
.pe2r3i1
.pe2r3í1
.pe3r4ia
.pe3r4iá
.pe2r1i2ac
.pe3r4ian
.pe2r3ib
.pe2r3íb
.pe3r4icl
.pe3r4ícl
.pe3r4icu
.pe3r4ícu
.pe2r3ie
.pe2r3íe
.pe2r3ié
.pe3r4ieb
.pe3r4iéb
.pe3r4iem
.pe3r4iém
.pe3r4ien
.pe3r4ién
.pe4r5iens
.pé4r5iens
.pe3r4ier
.pe3r4íer
.pe3r4iér
.pe4r5iera
.pé4r5iera
.pe4r5íera
.pe5r6ierat
.pé5r6ierat
.pe5r6íerat
.perie3i
.pe3r4iet
.pe3r4iét
.perié3i
.períe3i
.pe2r1i2ec
.pé2r3ii
.per5iit
.pér5iit
.pe4r3im
.pe4r3ím
.pé4r3im
.pe5r4imi
.pe5r4ími
.pe5r4imu
.pe5r4ímu
.pe6r5imus
.pe6r5ímus
.pe2r3in
.pe2r3ín
.pe3r4int
.pe3r4ínt
.pe3r4io
.pe3r4iod
.pe3r4iód
.peri3p2s
.peri3p2t
.pe2r3ir
.pe2r3ír
.pe3r4iremur
.pe3r4irémur
.pe3r4iremi
.pe3r4irémi
.pe3r4irentur
.pe3r4iréntur
.pe3r4irer
.pe3r4irér
.pe3r4írer
.pe3r4iret
.pe3r4irét
.pe4r5iret.
.pe4r5iretis
.pe4r5irétis
.pe3r4iri
.pe3r4íri
.pe3r4i3s2c
.pe3r4í3s2c
.peri3s2t
.pe3r4it
.pe3r4ít
.pe4r5itúr
.pe4r5itur
.pe4r5ítur
.pe4r5it.
.pe4r5itote
.pe4r5itóte
.pe2r3i4u
.pe2r3i4ú
.pe3r4i5un
.pe3r4i5ún
.pe4r3j
.pé4r3j
.pe2r1o2b3s2c
.pe2r1od
.pe2r1of
.pe2r1ol
.pe2r1op
.pe4r3or
.pe4r3ór
.pe2r3reg
.pe2r3s2c
.pe2r3s2p
.pe2r7s2t
.pé2r7s2t
.pe2r3tran2s1
.pe2r3trán2s1
.pe2r3u
.pe2r3ú
.pe2r1u2a
.pe2r1u2e
.pe2r1u2i
.pe3r4ul
.pe3r4úl
.pe2r1u2o
.pne4u
.po3et
.pos4t3ea
.pos4t3eá
.pós4t3ea
.pos4t3er
.pos4t3ér
.pós4t3er
.pos4t3h
.po4s4t3hac
.pos4t3il
.pos4t3íl
.posu3í
.pósu3i
.po2t3e
.po2t3é
.pó2t3e
.po4t3ue
.po4t3ui
.po4t3úe
.po4t3úi
.po4t3ué
.po4t3uí
.pó4t3ui
.præ1
.præ3a2u
.præ3es
.præi4a
.præi4á
.præi4ec
.præi4o
.præi4i
.præi4í
.præi4u
.præi4ú
.præ3s2c
.præ3s2p
.præ5s2t
.præte2r1
.præté2r1
.primi1
.primi3s2c
.pro2d1ea
.pró2d1ea
.pro1de1amb
.pro2d1eo
.pró2d1eo
.pro2d1es3s
.pro2d1és3s
.pro2d1eun
.pro2d1fu2
.pro2d1ib
.pro3d2i3d
.pro3d2í3d
.pro2d1ien
.pro2d1ién
.pró2d1ien
.pro2d1ier
.pro2d1iér
.pró2d1ier
.pro2d1ig
.pro2d1íg
.pró2d1ig
.pro2d3ii.
.pró2d3ii.
.pro2d1im
.pro2d1ir
.pro2d1ír
.pro2d3is
.pro2d3ís
.pro2d5it
.pro2d5ít
.pro3d6iti
.pro3d6íti
.pro3d6ito
.pro3d6íto
.pro3d6itr
.pro3g2n
.pro3i4e
.pro3i4é
.pro3i4i
.pro3i4í
.pró3i4i
.pro3in
.propte2r3
.propté2r3
.pro3s2c
.pro3s2p
.pró3s2p
.pro5s2t
.pro5s4tan
.pro5s4tar
.pro4s3tit
.pro4s3tra
.pro4s3trá
.pro3u
.pse4udo
.qua2m3o2b3
.que2m3a2d3m
.que2m3á2d3m
.quin2c3un
.quoa2d3usq
.quoa2d3úsq
.quo6d5l
.quo6n3iam
.quó6n3iam
.quo2t1an
.quo2t1enn
.quo2t3li
.r2
.ra2y
.re2d1ac
.re2d1ác
.re2d1ad
.re2d1ád
.re2d1am
.re2d1ám
.re2d1amb
.re2d1ámb
.re2d1an
.re2d1án
.re2d1ar
.re2d1ár
.re2d1arg
.re2d1árg
.re2d1a2u
.re2d1á2u
.re2d1ea
.ré2d1ea
.re2d1eá
.re2d1eg
.re2d1ég
.re2d1em
.re2d1ém
.re2d1eo
.ré2d1eo
.re2d1eu
.re2d1eú
.ré2d1eu
.re2d1h
.re2d1i.
.re2d1ib
.re2d1íb
.re3d2ic
.re2d1ien
.ré2d1ien
.re2d1ier
.re2d1íer
.re2d1iér
.re2d1ii
.ré2d1ii
.re2d1íi
.re2d1ií
.re2d1ig
.ré2d1ig
.re2d1im
.re2d1ím
.ré2d1im
.re4d3imi
.re2d1in
.re2d1ín
.re2d1ir
.re2d1ír
.re2d5is
.re2d5it
.re2d5ít
.ré2d5it
.re2d1iv
.re2d1ív
.re2d1ol
.re2d1ól
.ré2d1ol
.re2d1op
.re2d1óp
.re2d1ord
.re2d1órd
.re3d2orm
.re2d1orn
.re2d1órn
.re2d1ul
.re2d1úl
.re2d1un
.re2d1ún
.re2d1uv
.re2d1úv
.ree2x
.re1ie
.re3i2ec
.re1in
.re3ips
.re3ite
.repa2u
.re3s2cr
.re3s2cu
.re3s2cú
.re4s3pu4b3l4ic
.re4s3pú4b3l4ic
.re3s2p
.ré3s2p
.re3s2pec
.re3s2péc
.re5s4ta
.re5s4tá
.re5s2tag
.re5s4ta2u
.re5s2ter
.re5s2tér
.re5s2tib
.re5s2tíb
.re5s2tic
.re6s3ticu
.re5s2til
.re5s2tin
.re5s2tín
.re5s2tip
.re5s2típ
.ré5s4tit
.re5s4tit
.re5s4tít
.re5s2to
.re5s4tr
.ré5s4tr
.s2
.sa2t1ag
.sa2t1ág
.sati2s1
.sa3ul.
.seme2t3ip
.se2m3un
.se2m3us
.se3s4cen
.ses2c1u4n
.se4u.
.si2c1ut
.sí2c1ut
.si3s2ten
.s2m
.sta3g2n
.su2b3
.sú2b3
.subi4a
.subi4á
.subi4e
.subi4é
.subi4i
.subi4í
.súbi4i
.subi4u
.subi4ú
.sub5s4cr
.sub5s4t
.súb5s4t
.subte2r3h
.su3b4ul
.sú3b4ul
.su4b5ulc
.su4b5ult
.supe2r1ab
.supé2r1ab
.supe2r1áb
.supe3r2aba
.supe3r2abá
.supe3r2ába
.supe3r2abe
.supe3r2ábe
.supe3r2abi
.supe3r2ábi
.supe3r2abí
.supera2b3l
.superá2b3l
.supe3r2abo
.supe3r2ábo
.supe3r2abu
.supe3r2ábu
.supé3r2abu
.supe3r2abú
.supe4r3a2b3um
.supe4r3a2b3und
.supe4r3a2b3únd
.supe2r1ac
.supe2r1ad
.supé2r1ad
.supe2r1ád
.supera2d1i2i
.supera2d1i2í
.supe2r1ad3s2t
.supé2r1ad3s2t
.supe3r2æ.
.supé3r2æ.
.supe2r1æ
.supé2r1æ
.supe2r1ag
.supe2r1ág
.supé2r1ag
.supe2r1all
.supe2r1áll
.supe3r2am
.supé3r2am
.supe4r3amb
.supe4r3ámb
.supe3r2and
.supe3r2ánd
.supe4r3ap
.supe2r1arg
.supé2r1arg
.supe2r1asc
.supe2r1a3s2p
.supé2r1a3s2p
.supe2r1a3s2t
.supé2r1a3s2t
.supe2r1att
.supé2r1att
.supe2r1bib
.supé2r1bib
.supe2r1bif
.supé2r1bif
.supe2r1bil
.supé2r1bil
.supe2r1c
.supé2r1c
.supe2r1d
.supé2r1d
.supe2r1ed
